src/fst/phonology.twolc
!2014-10-23!"°:0 in Pros LEFT"
!2014-10-23! __@RULENAME@__
!2014-10-23! °:0 <=> _  ;
!! Second Vowel Center
!2014-10-23! Stems C*VC (underline)
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow Cns _ %> [ к: | %{рл%}: Vow: | м: а | м и | н а | н и | ң э | °: м ʼ | °: ʼ | °: ˮ | д: [ °: Cns | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | а | и ] | с и ] ;
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow Cns _ %> [ к: | %{рл%}: Vow: | м и | н и | ң э | °: м ʼ | °: ʼ | °: ˮ | д: [ °: Cns | %{ая%}: ] | с и ] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%>маˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 хан0%>ваˮ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>д%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман00%>та
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow Cns _ %^SCSG2: %> н: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%^SCSG2%>нась
!2014-10-23!!€0 хан00%>нась
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! Affixes
!2014-10-23! C*V%>C (underline)
!2014-10-23!   # [ 2InitSylls Cns* Vow (%^A2O:|%^A2I:) %> ˮ | Cns* Vow %> ˮ 0: ] Cns _  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңэ%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңэ%>ˮэм0на
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow [ (Cns: (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (0:) м:  _   ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€# ңу00%>м0на
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> 0: м:  _ н %{ая%}:  ;
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow [ (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | ˮ #  ]    ;
!2014-10-23!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>к°ˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 тар00%>к0ˮ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!  # Cns* Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _  [ ю DentStops | д | т | ʼ | ˮ # ]  ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow [ (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ]  %> д: _  [ р | в ] [ Vow ]  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д°ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мя0%>т0ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д°ваˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мя0%>т0ваˮ
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>д°ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңум0%>д0ремʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow %{нңʼØ%}:  %> д _  [  р ] [ а | и ]  ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!         # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: (%^A2O:|%^A2I:) %> (ˮ 0: ) м: _ н    ;
!2014-10-23!         Vow ( %{нңʼØ%}: ) %> (н:) _ ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ ( %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ) [ %> [ °: ц ь °: | с: Vow ] | %^SCSG2: %> н Vow ];
!2014-10-23!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ ( %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ) %> [ °: ц ь °: | с: Vow ];
!2014-10-23!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ ( %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ) %> °: ц ь °: ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ С1: %> °: ц ь °: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>°ць°
!2014-10-23!!€# ман0с0аць0
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°ць°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил000аць0
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>сиˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман000циˮ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%^SCSG2%>нась
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман0000тась
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %>  д: [ °: м °: | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> [ д: [ °: [м °:] | %{ая%}: ]| д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ С1: %> [ д: [ °: Cns | %{ая%}: | и ]| ( м:|н:) д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | и | а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] [ %> [ к: а | ң э | к: °: (ˮ) DentStops ((°:) DentStops ) [ :Vow | °: # | °: %> ]| м Vow | н Vow | [ к: | м ] °: [(ˮ) н [ %{ая%}: | з | д а ] | м и | м а | н и | т ә: | ю DentStops |  [ д | т] ә: ] | %{рл%}: :Vow ] | е | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!       # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] [ %> [ к:] а | ң э | к: °: (ˮ) DentStops ((°:) DentStops ) [ :Vow | °: # | °: %> ]| м Vow | н Vow | ( м:|н:) д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | и | а | о ] | [ к: | м ] °: [(ˮ) н [ %{ая%}: | з | д а ] | м и | м а | н и | т ә: | ю DentStops |  [ д | т] ә: ] | %{рл%}: :Vow ] | е | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°д°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гад0
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°д°н°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гадан0
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гана
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°ˮн%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гаˮна
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил000мана
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е%>ˮм°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ъе0ˮмана
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°юн°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гаюн0
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°ˮниʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гаˮниʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! C*VC+%>C_
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    # Cns* Vow: Cns %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> н: _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!     %^SCSG2: %> н: _ ʼ [ %> | #] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңум000д0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 илан00д0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мана000т0ʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! THIRD VOWEL CENTER
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns :Vow ( (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) %> ( н:) _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns  °:  [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!        # Cns* Vow: Cns :Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (н:|к:) _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) [ 2VowCenterLC | Cns* Vow Cns °: ] %> м: _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңуда%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңуда0в0на
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 хану0в0на
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns °: [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ] [ е | о ] %> ˮ м _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns °: [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ] е %> ˮ м _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е%>ˮм°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ъе0ˮмана
!2014-10-23!      Vow %> _  ;
!2014-10-23!      :Vow %> _  ;
!2014-10-23!       %> _ [ (м) ʼ | ˮ ] # ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°мʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңув000мʼ
!2014-10-23!       _ (%{йнңъʼØ%}:|С1:) # ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман0ˮ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      в _ ʼ # ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!"°:0 in Pros RIGHT"
!2014-10-23! __@RULENAME@__
!2014-10-23! °:0 =>
!2014-10-23! Second Vowel Center
!2014-10-23! Stems
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow Cns _ %> [ к: | %{рл%}: Vow: | м: а | м и | н а | н и | ң э | °: м ʼ | °: ʼ | °: ˮ | д: [ °: Cns | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | а | и ] | с и ] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%>маˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 хан00ваˮ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>д%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман000та
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow Cns _ %^SCSG2: %> н: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%^SCSG2%>нась
!2014-10-23!!€0 хан000нась
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! AFFIXES
!2014-10-23!   # [ 2InitSylls Cns* Vow (%^A2O:|%^A2I:) %> ˮ | Cns* Vow %> ˮ 0: ] Cns _  ;
!2014-10-23!   # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow %> ˮ 0: Cns _  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңэ%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңэ0ˮэм0на
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow [ (Cns: (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (0:) м:  _  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңу000м0на
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!   # Cns* Vow [ (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | ˮ #  ]    ;
!2014-10-23!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>к°ˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 тар000к0ˮ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!  # Cns* Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _  [ ю DentStops | д | т | ʼ | ˮ # ]  ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow [ (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ]  %> д: _  [ р | в ] [ Vow ]  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д°ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мя00т0ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д°ваˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мя00т0ваˮ
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>д°ремʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңум00д0ремʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ]  %> д: _  [  р ] [ Vow ]  ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: (%^A2O:|%^A2I:) %> (ˮ 0: ) м: _ н    ;
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* :Vow ( (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) %> (н:|к:) _  [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 илан0д0ʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ ( %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ) [ %> [ °: ц ь °: | с: Vow ] | %^SCSG2: %> н Vow ];
!2014-10-23!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ ( %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ) %> [ °: ц ь °: | с: Vow ];
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>°ць°
!2014-10-23!!€# ман0с0аць0
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°ць°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил000аць0
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%>сиˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман000циˮ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%^SCSG2%>нась
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман0000тась
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %>  д: [ °: м °: | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> [ д: [ °: [м °:] ]| д: [ а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> [ д: [ °: [м °:] | %{ая%}: ]| д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> [ д: [ °: [м °:] | %{ая%}: | и ]| ( м:|н:) д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | и | а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!    # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ С1: %> [ д: [ °: Cns | %{ая%}: | и ]| ( м:|н:) д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | и | а | о ] ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!       # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] [ %> [ к: а | ң э | к: °: (ˮ) DentStops ((°:) DentStops ) [ :Vow | °: # | °: %> ]| м Vow | н Vow | [ к: | м ] °: [(ˮ) н [ %{ая%}: | з | д а ] | м и | м а | н и | т ә: | ю DentStops |  [ д | т] ә: ] | %{рл%}: :Vow ] | е | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!       # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns _ [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] [ %> [ к: а | ң э | к: °: (ˮ) DentStops ((°:) DentStops ) [ :Vow | °: # | °: %> ]| м Vow | н Vow | ( м:|н:) д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | и | а | о ] | [ к: | м ] °: [(ˮ) н [ %{ая%}: | з | д а ] | м и | м а | н и | т ә: | ю DentStops |  [ д | т] ә: ] | %{рл%}: :Vow ] | е | о ] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>к°д°
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ң0гад
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ъе
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил000мана
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е%>ˮм°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ъе0ˮмана
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>%{рл%}аˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил000лаˮ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! C*VC+%>C_
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    # Cns* Vow: Cns %{йнңъʼØ%}: %> н: _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!    %^SCSG2: %> н: _ ʼ [ %> | #] ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңум000д0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 илан00д0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1%^SCSG2%>н°ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 мана000т0ʼ
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23! THIRD VOWEL CENTER
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns :Vow ( (Cns (%^PalVariation:)) [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) %> ( н:) _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns  °:  [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!        # Cns* Vow: Cns :Vow [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (н:|к:) _ [ ʼ | ˮ # ] ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) [ 2VowCenterLC | Cns* Vow Cns °: ] %> м: _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) 2VowCenterLC %> м: _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ңуда%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ңуда0в0на
!2014-10-23!!€# хан°%>м°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 хану0в0на
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow: Cns °: [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | С1: ] [ е | о ] %> ˮ м _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е%>ˮм°н%{ая%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ъе0ˮмана
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      Vow %> _  ;
!2014-10-23!      :Vow %> _  ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!       %> _  [ (м) ʼ | ˮ ] # ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°ˮ
!2014-10-23!!€0 ила000ˮ
!2014-10-23!       _ (%{йнңъʼØ%}:|С1:) # ;
!2014-10-23!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}
!2014-10-23!!€0 ил0ʼ
!2014-10-23!!€# ман°С1
!2014-10-23!!€0 ман0ˮ
!2014-10-23!       _ (%{йнңъʼØ%}:) # ;
!2014-10-23!      в _ ʼ # ;
!2014-10-23!
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow (%{нңʼØ%}:)  %> д _  [[ д | м | м д | н д | в | н  ] [ °: | Vow ]| м ʼ ]  ;
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow (%{нңʼØ%}:)  %> д _  [[ д | м | м д | н д   ] [ °: | Vow ]| м ʼ ]  ;
!2014-10-23!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow (%{нңʼØ%}:)  %> д _  [ в  а | н Vow ]   ;
!2014-10-23!!€# мараңга%>д°ваˮ
